Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5167.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11531a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, beginning January 1, 2027, a local unit of government shall not contract with a solid waste hauler or a recycling hauler to provide exclusive service for use by residents to any area within the local unit of government's jurisdiction. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply to either of the following: (a) A contract that was entered into before January 1, 2027. (b) Subject to subsection (3), the governing body of a local unit of government adopts a resolution to enter into a contract with a solid waste hauler or recycling hauler to provide exclusive service for use by residents to any area within the local unit of government's jurisdiction. (3) A resolution adopted under subsection (2)(b) does not take effect unless the resolution is approved by a majority of the electors of the local unit of government voting on the question. (4) If a majority of electors of the local unit of government voting on the question approve the resolution as described in subsection (2)(b), the governing body of the local unit of government is authorized to enter into the contract with a solid waste hauler or recycling hauler to provide exclusive service for use by residents to any area within the local unit of government's jurisdiction.